Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 23
TRAINING AND RETRAINING PROGRAMS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 11 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1988, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. sections are shown in editors' notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 34-20-102.

Section

34-23-101. Training and retraining.

The office of active and inactive mines may establish miner training and retraining programs and make such programs available to those operators and miners who request the assistance of the office of active and inactive mines in meeting the miner training and retraining requirements of the federal law.

Such programs shall be available throughout the state of Colorado and shall be offered at sites which are accessible by operators and miners.

The office of active and inactive mines may request the advice and assistance of the board in developing training and retraining programs for coal mines with respect to coal mine certification requirements.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1194, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1934, § 23, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-122 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-23-102. Technical assistance.

The office of active and inactive mines shall advise and assist operators in this state as may be necessary for mine safety on request of the operator. Such assistance shall include compliance with the federal law.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1194, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1934, § 24, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-122 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-23-103. Mine rescue teams.

The office of active and inactive mines shall assist operators in complying with the mine rescue team requirements of the "Federal Mine Safety and Health Act of 1977", Pub.L. 95-164, as amended. Such assistance may include, but need not be limited to:

The establishing, equipping, and, where funds are available, training and maintaining of mine rescue teams;

The acquisition of funds for sustaining mine rescue centers;

Any assistance with rescue costs, where funds are available, at abandoned mines;

Making application for funds in cooperation with the division of emergency management to pay rescue costs; and

Technical assistance and training in mining rescue procedures for local officials.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1194, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended and (1)(e) added, p. 1935, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1183, § 19, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-122 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-23-104. Grant authorization.

The office of active and inactive mines may apply for and accept federal, state, or private grants to further the purposes and objectives of this article.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1194, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1935, § 26, effective July 1.

34-23-105. Conflict with "Colorado Mined Land Reclamation Act" and "Colorado Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Act".

Nothing in this article shall apply to any mining operation regarding reclamation of mined land which is regulated by the mined land reclamation board or division pursuant to article 32 or 33 of this title.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1194, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-121 as it existed prior 1988.